Arkansas, session 2025, HB1104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - SHARED SERVICES. There is hereby
established for the Department of Labor and Licensing for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) SC010 SECRETARY OF LABOR & LICENSING 1 GRADE SE05
(2) D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT07
(3) D063C COMPUTER SUPPORT SPECIALIST 3 GRADE IT05
(4) D057C INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY MANAGER 1 GRADE IT05
(5) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
*KMW003*
01/09/2025 10:54:28 AM KMW003

HB1104
(6) N245N DLL CHIEF OF STAFF 1 GRADE GS15
(7) U135U DLL DIVISION OF LABOR DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS15
(8) G019C GENERAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS13
(9) G004C MANAGING ATTORNEY 1 GRADE GS13
(10) A021C AGENCY CONTROLLER I 1 GRADE GS12
(11) R013C AGENCY HUMAN RESOURCES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(12) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(13) G308C DLL ENFORCEMENT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(14) R021C BUDGET ANALYST 1 GRADE GS08
(15) A116C BUSINESS OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(16) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(17) C094C ATHLETIC COMMISSION PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS06
(18) A074C FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS06
(19) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(20) G179C LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(21) P031C MEDIA SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(22) C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(23) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 26

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - SHARED SERVICES. There is hereby authorized,
for the Department of Labor and Licensing - Shared Services for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: four (4) temporary or part-time employees, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - SHARED SERVICES PAYING ACCOUNT. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable
from the paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Labor and Licensing - Shared Services Paying Account for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

01/09/2025 10:54:28 AM KMW003

HB1104
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,973,081
(02) EXTRA HELP 77,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 656,260
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,130,704
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 15,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,852,045

SECTION 4. REGULAR SALARIES - DIVISION OF LABOR. There is hereby
established for the Department of Labor and Licensing - Division of Labor
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular
employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) D068C INFORMATION SYSTEMS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT04
(2) G096C DLL LABOR DIVISION MANAGER 4 GRADE GS09
(3) X052C DLL LABOR INSPECTOR SUPERVISOR 8 GRADE GS08
(4) X051C DLL LABOR MEDIATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(5) E026C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(6) G159C DEPARTMENT BUSINESS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(7) X065C DLL LABOR INSPECTOR 26 GRADE GS07
(8) E048C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS07
(9) G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(10) A072C RESEARCH & STATISTICS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(11) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 4 GRADE GS06
(12) X122C DLL LABOR STANDARDS INVESTIGATOR 8 GRADE GS06
(13) A093C STATISTICIAN 2 GRADE GS06
(14) V014C BUYER 1 GRADE GS05
01/09/2025 10:54:28 AM KMW003

HB1104
(15) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 8 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 69

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable from
the Department of Labor and Licensing Fund Account, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Labor and Licensing - Division of
Labor - State Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,652,017
(02) EXTRA HELP 0
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 636,633
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 354,954
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 42,395
(C) PROF. FEES 3,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,688,999

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - BOILER INSPECTION. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable from
the Department of Labor and Licensing Special Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Labor and Licensing - Division of
Labor - Boiler Inspection for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $462,090
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 185,341
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 201,804
01/09/2025 10:54:28 AM KMW003

HB1104
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 14,044
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $863,279

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - BOARD OF ELECTRICAL EXAMINERS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable
from the Department of Labor and Licensing Special Fund, for personal
services and operating expenses of the Department of Labor and Licensing -
Division of Labor - Board of Electrical Examiners for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $414,911
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 164,532
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 111,738
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 6,430
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $697,611

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - FEDERAL PROGRAMS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable from
the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Labor and
Licensing - Division of Labor - Federal Programs for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $923,235
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 385,345
01/09/2025 10:54:28 AM KMW003

HB1104
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 246,963
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 43,950
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,599,493

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - WAGE AND HOUR - CASH. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable from
the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for distribution of wages due employees from
employers in Arkansas by the Department of Labor and Licensing - Division of
Labor - Wage and Hour - Cash for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) WAGES DUE $200,000

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - SEMINAR AND CONFERENCE EXPENSES - CASH.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be
payable from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for operating expenses from the
deposit of registration fees collected for seminars and conferences by the
Department of Labor and Licensing - Division of Labor - Seminar and
Conference Expenses - Cash for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $2,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 46,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
01/09/2025 10:54:28 AM KMW003

HB1104
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $48,000

SECTION 11. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE
ARKANSAS CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
SHARED SERVICES. (a)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create a
Shared Services paying accounts on his or her books and on the books of the
Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal
services and operating expenses in the Shared Services Paying Account
Appropriation by the Department of Labor and Licensing.
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the transfer
of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account
appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(3) The transfer authority provided to the department in
subdivision (a)(2) of this section may be used to make transfers only within
the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts
authorized for the department.
(4) The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the date of
passage through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 12. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 13. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
01/09/2025 10:54:28 AM KMW003

HB1104
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 14. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.





















01/09/2025 10:54:28 AM KMW003